Utah statutes.
53A-3-414.   Local school boards' responsibility for school buildings and grounds when used as civic centers.

(1)  As used in this section, "civic center" has the same meaning as provided in Section 53A-3-413.

(2)  A local school board:

(a)  shall manage, direct, and control civic centers under this chapter;

(b)  shall adopt policies for the use of civic centers;

(c)  may charge a reasonable fee for the use of school facilities as a civic center so that the district incurs no expense for that use;

(d)  may appoint a special functions officer under Section 53-13-105 to have charge of the grounds and protect school property when used for civic center purposes;

(e)  shall allow the use of a civic center, for other than school purposes, unless it determines that the use interferes with a school function or purpose; and

(f)  shall ensure that school administrators are trained about and properly implement the provisions of this section and Section 53A-3-413.



Amended by Chapter 199, 2008 General Session

